Tennessee, session 114, SB1596.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 67, Chapter 4, Part 20, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
67-4-2024.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Eligible charitable organization" means an organization that is
approved by the office as meeting the eligibility criteria established in subsection
(e), and that:
(A) Is exempt from federal income taxation under § 501(c)(3) of
the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3));
(B) Is a nonprofit organization formed under title 48;
(C) Has residents of this state comprising at least fifty percent
(50%) of the organization's beneficiaries, clients, or users; and
(D) Has residents of a tier 3 or tier 4 enhancement county, as
defined in § 67-4-2109(a)(2)(C), comprising at least twenty-five percent
(25%) of the organization's beneficiaries, clients, or users;
(2) "Office" means the governor's office of faith-based and community
initiatives established pursuant to title 4, chapter 32; and
(3) "Qualified business" means a taxpayer subject to tax under this part
and part 21 of this chapter, including a C corporation, S corporation, limited
SB1596
008805
- 1 -

liability company, or limited liability partnership, that is approved by the
department for the tax credit in this section.
(b) For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, but prior to January 1,
2032, there is allowed a credit of fifty percent (50%) of a monetary contribution made by
a qualified business to an eligible charitable organization against the taxes imposed
pursuant to this part and part 21 of this chapter in the tax year in which the contribution
is made.
(c) The credit allowed under subsection (b) must not exceed five thousand
dollars ($5,000) per qualified business for each contribution made to an eligible
charitable organization in a tax year.
(d) For credits allocated during a tax year from contributions to eligible charitable
organizations, no more than twenty percent (20%) of the credits may be allocated for
contributions to a single eligible charitable organization, and no more than ten (10)
eligible charitable organizations may be approved by the office.
(e) To be approved as an eligible charitable organization, the organization must
submit an application to the office that describes its specific projects and how the
contributions made to the organization are to be used for each project, and that
demonstrates that the organization's projects expand this state's values of volunteerism
and human flourishing, as determined by the office. The application must be
accompanied by a written certification, signed by an officer of the organization under
penalty of perjury, confirming the organization's eligibility under the criteria established in
subdivisions (a)(1)(A)-(D) and this subsection (e).
(f) The office shall review each application submitted by an organization
pursuant to subsection (e) and determine whether the organization meets all the criteria
to be considered an eligible charitable organization and notify the organization of its
- 2 - 008805

determination. The organization shall notify the office within sixty (60) days of any
changes that may adversely affect the organization's eligibility status. An organization
approved by the office in a tax year must reapply to be approved in a subsequent tax
year, and must not be approved for more than three (3) consecutive tax years.
(g) To claim a credit, the taxpayer shall file an application with the commissioner
on a form prescribed by the commissioner. The taxpayer shall provide the name of the
eligible charitable organization receiving funds from the taxpayer and the amount of the
contribution. In the application, the taxpayer shall certify to the department the dollar
amount of the contributions made to the eligible charitable organization during the tax
year and provide evidence of the contributions as required by the department.
(h) The commissioner may conduct audits or require the filing of additional
information necessary to substantiate or adjust the amount of the credit allowed by this
section and to determine that the taxpayer has complied with all statutory requirements
for the credit.
(i) The commissioner shall review the documentation submitted by the taxpayer
and notify the taxpayer of the approved credit.
(j) Unused credit may be carried forward in any tax period until the credit is
taken; provided, however, that the credit must not be carried forward for more than
twenty-five (25) years.
(k) The commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the
purposes of this section. The rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform
Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.
(l) On or before January 1, 2027, the department shall submit a one-time report
to the finance, ways and means committee of the senate and the committee of the
house of representatives having jurisdiction over finance matters, setting forth the clear,
- 3 - 008805

relevant, and ascertainable metrics and data requirements that the department will track
under this section in order to allow the general assembly to measure the effectiveness of
the tax expenditure allowed in this section.
SECTION 2. For purposes of promulgating forms, this act takes effect upon becoming a
law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, this act takes effect July 1, 2026, the
public welfare requiring it.
- 4 - 008805